static/hunspell/28.01.2024/bash.aff
FLAG num
SFX 114 оҡ ҡообоҙҙағынандыр . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Abl+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооғоҙҙағынандыр . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Abl+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоомдағылалыр . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооңдағылалыр . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоондағылалыр . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡообоҙҙағылалыр . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооғоҙҙағылалыр . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоомдағыныңсы . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооңдағыныңсы . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоондағыныңсы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡообоҙҙағыныңсы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооғоҙҙағыныңсы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоомдағығасы . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооңдағығасы . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоондағығасы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡообоҙҙағығасы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооғоҙҙағығасы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоомдағынысы . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооңдағынысы . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоондағынысы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡообоҙҙағынысы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооғоҙҙағынысы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоомдағынансы . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооңдағынансы . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоондағынансы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡообоҙҙағынансы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооғоҙҙағынансы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоомдағыласы . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооңдағыласы . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоондағыласы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡообоҙҙағыласы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооғоҙҙағыласы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоомдағымы . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Q
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооңдағымы . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Q
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоондағымы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Q
SFX 114 оҡ ҡообоҙҙағымы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Q
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооғоҙҙағымы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Q
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоомдағылыр . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооңдағылыр . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоондағылыр . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡообоҙҙағылыр . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооғоҙҙағылыр . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоомдағысы . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооңдағысы . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоондағысы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡообоҙҙағысы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооғоҙҙағысы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоомдағылай . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооңдағылай . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоондағылай . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX 114 оҡ ҡообоҙҙағылай . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооғоҙҙағылай . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоомдағыса . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооңдағыса . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоондағыса . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX 114 оҡ ҡообоҙҙағыса . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооғоҙҙағыса . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоомдағылаймы . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооңдағылаймы . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоондағылаймы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX 114 оҡ ҡообоҙҙағылаймы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооғоҙҙағылаймы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоомдағысамы . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооңдағысамы . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоондағысамы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX 114 оҡ ҡообоҙҙағысамы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооғоҙҙағысамы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоомдағылайҙыр . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооңдағылайҙыр . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоондағылайҙыр . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡообоҙҙағылайҙыр . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооғоҙҙағылайҙыр . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоомдағысалыр . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооңдағысалыр . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоондағысалыр . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡообоҙҙағысалыр . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооғоҙҙағысалыр . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоомдағылайсы . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооңдағылайсы . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоондағылайсы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡообоҙҙағылайсы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооғоҙҙағылайсы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоомдағысасы . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооңдағысасы . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоондағысасы . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡообоҙҙағысасы . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооғоҙҙағысасы . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоомаса . +PxSg1+Der/ҡаса
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооңаса . +PxSg2+Der/ҡаса
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоонаса . +PxSg3+Der/ҡаса
SFX 114 оҡ ҡообоҙғаса . +PxPl1+Der/ҡаса
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооғоҙғаса . +PxPl2+Der/ҡаса
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоомасамы . +PxSg1+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооңасамы . +PxSg2+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоонасамы . +PxSg3+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX 114 оҡ ҡообоҙғасамы . +PxPl1+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооғоҙғасамы . +PxPl2+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоомасалыр . +PxSg1+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооңасалыр . +PxSg2+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоонасалыр . +PxSg3+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡообоҙғасалыр . +PxPl1+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооғоҙғасалыр . +PxPl2+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоомасасы . +PxSg1+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооңасасы . +PxSg2+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡоонасасы . +PxSg3+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡообоҙғасасы . +PxPl1+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ ҡооғоҙғасасы . +PxPl2+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ оҡмо . +Q
SFX 114 оҡ оҡмолор . +Q+Indf
SFX 114 оҡ оҡтор . +Indf
SFX 114 оҡ оҡсо . +Clt/сы
SFX 114 оҡ оҡтоҡо/137 . +Poss
SFX 114 оҡ оҡҡай/139 . +Dim
SFX 114 оҡ оҡтай/141 . +Der/дай
SFX 114 оҡ оҡса/143 . +Der/са
SFX 114 оҡ оҡтағы/145 . +Der/дағы
SFX 114 оҡ оҡтағылар/115 . +Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 114 оҡ оҡло/149 . +Der/лы
SFX 114 оҡ оҡһоҙ/153 . +Abe
SFX 114 оҡ оҡҡаса/155 . +Der/ҡаса
